Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1345.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Medical Assistance Coverage for Menopause Treatments.-- (a) Subject to Federal approval, the department shall provide medical assistance coverage for hormonal and non-hormonal treatments for the management of menopausal symptoms for eligible and enrolled medical assistance recipients . Coverage under this section shall include all of the following:(1) Coverage for all drugs, devices and combination products approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for 123456789101112131415161718 the treatment of menopausal symptoms.(2) Coverage for behavioral therapy that assists individuals in coping with menopausal symptoms.(3) Coverage for therapy to treat menopause that has been induced by a hysterectomy.(b) The department shall seek a State plan amendment or Federal waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, if needed, for the provision of hormonal and non-hormonal treatments for the management of menopausal symptoms under the medical assistance program.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Hysterectomy." A surgical procedure to remove a woman's uterus, which may include removal of the cervix, ovaries or fallopian tubes."Menopausal symptoms." Any of the following:(1) Irregular menstrual periods.(2) Hot flashes.(3) Vaginal or bladder changes.(4) Decreased fertility.(5) Loss of bone density, including osteoporosis.(6) Elevated low-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels.(7) Sleep disturbances, including night sweats."Menopause." The permanent cessation of menstruation resulting from the loss of ovarian follicular function, characterized by the end of ovulation and a decline in estrogen and progesterone production.Section 2. If a necessary State plan amendment or Federal waiver under section 443.16 of the act is approved by the 20250HB1345PN1534 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Secretary of Human Services shall transmit notice of the approval to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the addition of section 443.16 of the act shall take effect 30 days following publication of the notice under section 2 of this act.(2) The addition of section 443.16(b) and (c) of the act shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1345PN1534 - 3 - 12345678910111213